Arkansas, session 2025, HB1794.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-42-307(c), concerning the expiration and
renewal of a real estate license, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) To Except as provided under subdivision (c)(3) of this section,
to renew or reactivate a license, a licensee shall complete the number of
classroom hours of continuing education or the distance education equivalent
of continuing education required by the commission for each inactive year not
to exceed a total of thirty (30) classroom hours.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(1) of this section, a
person is not subject to the education requirements of this section while the
person's license is inactive.
(3)(A) The commission In addition to the continuing education
exemptions under subdivision (c)(3)(B) of this section, the Executive
Director of the Arkansas Real Estate Commission may waive all or part of the
*LGL022*
03/13/2025 3:02:36 PM LGL022

HB1794
requirements of subdivision (c)(1) of this section:
(i) if If a licensee is unable to complete the
continuing education due to extenuating circumstances.;
(ii) On the basis of health-related concerns or
restrictions of the licensee; or
(iii) In recognition of a licensee's achievements,
including without limitation achievements relating to the real estate
industry or legislative service.
(B)(i) A salesperson licensee or an associate broker
licensee may submit a written application to the commission for exemption
from the requirements of subdivision (c)(1) of this section with satisfactory
proof that, in the calendar year immediately preceding the renewal or
reactivation of a salesperson license or an associate broker license, the
salesperson licensee or the associate broker licensee:
(a) Is seventy-two (72) years of age or older;
(b) Has held an active Arkansas salesperson or
an active Arkansas associate broker license for a consecutive twenty-five
(25) years or more;
(c) Has had no disciplinary action taken
against him or her by the commission during the five (5) years immediately
preceding the renewal or reactivation period of his or her salesperson
license or associate broker license; and
(d) Has had no delinquent continuing education
requirements under subdivision (c)(1) of this section during the five (5)
years immediately preceding the renewal or reactivation period of his or her
salesperson license or associate broker license.
(ii) A principal broker licensee or an executive
broker licensee may submit a written application to the commission for
exemption from the requirements of subdivision (c)(1) of this section with
satisfactory proof that, in the calendar year immediately preceding the
renewal or reactivation of a principal broker license or an executive broker
license, the principal broker licensee or an executive broker licensee:
(a) Is seventy-two (72) years of age or older;
(b) Has held an active Arkansas principal
broker license or an active Arkansas executive broker license for a
consecutive twenty-five (25) years or more;
03/13/2025 3:02:36 PM LGL022

HB1794
(c) Has had no disciplinary action taken
against himself or herself or a licensee under his or her supervision by the
commission during the five (5) years immediately preceding the renewal or
reactivation period of his or her principal broker license or executive
broker license; and
(d) Has had no delinquent continuing education
requirements himself or herself or a licensee under his or her supervision
has had no delinquent continuing education requirements under subdivision
(c)(1) of this section during the five (5) years immediately preceding the
renewal or reactivation period of his or her principal broker license or
executive broker license.
(4) A continuing education exemption approved by the executive
director under subdivision (c)(3) of this section may be revoked as a result
of disciplinary action taken against a licensee after approval is granted.
(5) A continuing education exemption denied by the executive
director under subdivision (c)(3) of this section may be appealed to the
commission.
(6) Except as provided under subdivision (c)(3) of this section,
an executive broker licensee, a principal broker licensee, an associate
broker licensee, or a salesperson licensee is not exempt from the
requirements of subdivision (c)(1) of this section.















03/13/2025 3:02:36 PM LGL022